California statutes. Water Code
A facility described in this article shall not be constructed or operated within the boundaries of an agency that has contracted for a supply of water from the State Water Resources Development System unless the department enters into a contract with that agency concerning the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Feather River and Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Diversion Projects [11260. - 11261.]

11260.

The units set forth in publication of the State Water Resources Board entitled “Report on Feasibility of Feather River Project and Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Diversion Projects Proposed as Features of the California Water Plan,” dated May, 1951, as modified in the publication of the Division of Water Resources entitled “Program for Financing and Constructing the Feather River Project as the Initial Unit of the California Water Plan,” dated February, 1955, and including the upstream features set forth in Chapter VI of the 1955 report, except the features on the south fork of the Feather River, and as further modified by the recommendations contained in Bulletin No. 78 of the Department of Water Resources, entitled “Preliminary Summary Report on Investigation of Alternative Aqueduct Systems to Serve Southern California,” dated February, 1959, and subject to such further modifications thereof as the Department of Water Resources may adopt, and such units or portions thereof may be constructed by the department and maintained and operated by it to such extent and for such period as the department may determine, as units of the Central Valley Project separate and apart from any or all other units thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

11261.

The reservoir constructed at Cedar Springs in the San Bernardino Mountains as part of the Feather River Project shall be known as “Silverwood Lake.”

The department shall erect at the reservoir a suitable marker commemorating the contributions made to soil and water conservation by W. E. (Ted) Silverwood. 

The department is authorized to receive donations and contributions from the public and to apply the proceeds thereof to the erection and maintenance of the marker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1599.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.6. American River Development [11265. - 11265.]

11265.

The American River Development, as described in Public Law 356 of the Eighty-first Congress, First Session, and as constructed by the Federal Government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1121.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.7. North Bay Aqueduct [11270. - 11271.]

11270.

The unit of the North Bay Aqueduct as set forth in Bulletin No. 60 of the Department of Water Resources entitled “Salinity Control Barrier Investigation,” dated March 1, 1957, subject to such modification thereof as the department may adopt, and such unit or portions thereof may be constructed by the department and maintained and operated by it to such extent and for such period as the department may determine, as a feature of the California Water Plan, and as a unit of the Central Valley Project, separate and apart from any or all other units thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2252.)
-------------------------------------------

11271.

The operation of the North Bay Aqueduct, or any joint-use facilities of that unit or project, shall conform to any applicable standard established by the State Water Resources Control Board relating to the State Water Resources Development System. The director shall continue the work of the Sacramento-San Joaquin water supervision service now under way to maintain continuing records of the source, extent, and occurrence of salinity throughout the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 354, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.9. Black Butte Dam and Reservoir [11276. - 11276.]

11276.

Black Butte Dam and Reservoir, substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 649, 78th Congress, Second Session, and authorized by act of Congress approved December 22, 1944, Public Law 534, 78th Congress, Second Session, subject to such modifications thereof as the department may adopt, and such unit may be constructed and operated separate and apart from any or all other units thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Additional Units [11290. - 11290.]

11290.

The project includes such other units as may be from time to time added by the department to the units specifically enumerated. The department may add additional units which are consistent with and which may be constructed, maintained, and operated as a part of the project and in furtherance of the single object contemplated by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Additional Plants and Works [11295. - 11295.]

11295.

In addition to the works specified, the units shall include such plants and works for the generation of electric power by steam or other power, and such electric transmission lines and facilities for the sale, use, and distribution of electric power as the department determines to be necessary for making a reasonable, proper, and advantageous sale, use, and distribution of electric power made available by the units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Department of Water Resources [11419. - 11465.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administrative Provisions [11419. - 11420.]

11419.

The department shall keep full and complete accounts concerning all matters and things relating to the project and annually shall prepare balance sheet and income and profit and loss statements showing the financial condition of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11420.

All books and papers pertaining to matters provided for in this part shall at all reasonable times be open to the inspection of any party interested or any citizen of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Powers and Duties [11450. - 11455.]

11450.

The provisions of this article are subject to the provisions of Chapter 4 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11451.

The department shall have full charge and control of the construction, operation, and maintenance of the project and the collection of all rates, charges, and revenues from it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11452.

The department shall proceed with the construction of the project immediately upon funds being available therefor and shall carry such work to completion as rapidly as possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11453.

The collection of rates, charges, and revenues shall be continued as provided in this part until all bonds issued are fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.

Under such regulations and upon such terms, limitations, and conditions as it prescribes, the department may do any of the following:

(a) Fix and establish the prices, rates, and charges at which the resources and facilities made available by the project shall be sold and disposed of.

(b) (1) Enter into contracts and agreements and do any and all things which in its judgment are necessary, convenient, or expedient for the accomplishment of the purposes and objects of this part.

(2) The contracts and agreements may include provisions for the indemnification of parties with whom the department contracts as necessary to accomplish the purposes and objects of this part, except that the contracts and agreements may not include provisions for the indemnification, including indemnification for any costs of defense, of any party to those contracts or agreements for that party’s acts or omissions involving negligence, gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct or for acts or omissions involving negligence, gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct on the part of that party’s employees, agents, or contractors.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the amendments made to this subdivision during the 1997 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session are declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 566, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11455.

The department shall enter into such contracts and fix and establish such prices, rates, and charges so as at all times to provide revenue which will afford sufficient funds to pay all costs of operation and maintenance of the works authorized by this part, together with necessary repairs and replacements thereto, and which will provide at all times sufficient funds for redemption of all bonds and payment of interest thereon, as and when such costs and charges become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limitation of Powers [11460. - 11465.]

11460.

In the construction and operation by the department of any project under the provisions of this part a watershed or area wherein water originates, or an area immediately adjacent thereto which can conveniently be supplied with water therefrom, shall not be deprived by the department directly or indirectly of the prior right to all of the water reasonably required to adequately supply the beneficial needs of the watershed, area, or any of the inhabitants or property owners therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.

In no other way than by purchase or otherwise as provided in this part shall water rights of a watershed, area, or the inhabitants be impaired or curtailed by the department, but the provisions of this article shall be strictly limited to the acts and proceedings of the department, as such, and shall not apply to any persons or state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.

The provisions of this article shall not be so construed as to create any new property rights other than against the department as provided in this part or to require the department to furnish to any person without adequate compensation therefor any water made available by the construction of any works by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11463.

In the construction and operation by the department of any project under the provisions of this part, no exchange of the water of any watershed or area for the water of any other watershed or area may be made by the department unless the water requirements of the watershed or area in which the exchange is made are first and at all times met and satisfied to the extent that the requirements would have been met were the exchange not made, and no right to the use of water shall be gained or lost by reason of any such exchange.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11464.

No water right, reservoir, conduit, or facility for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electric power, acquired by the department shall ever be sold, granted, or conveyed by the department so that the department thereby is divested of the title to and ownership of it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11465.

The department shall not make any change, alteration, or revision of any rates, prices, or charges established by any contract entered into pursuant to this part except as provided by the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Cooperation with the United States [11500. - 11500.]

11500.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary or in conflict herewith the department may do any or all of the following:

(a) Enter into contracts with the United States for the construction, maintenance, or operation of all or any part of the project or for the financing thereof.

(b) Enter into contracts for the acquisition by the department of the works and properties of the project or any part thereof and for the repayment by the department of the cost thereof to the United States.

(c) Conform to such requirements, not otherwise inconsistent with the law of this State, as may be prescribed by the United States under congressional legislation now in effect or which may hereafter be adopted or under rules and regulations duly adopted thereunder.

(d) Transfer land owned or acquired for the construction of the project, or any part thereof to the United States pursuant to a contract with the department for such construction in conjunction with the construction of a federally authorized project utilizing the facilities with the state authorized project.

(e) Otherwise co-operate with the United States to the end that the people of the State may receive the benefits to be derived from the construction, maintenance, and operation of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2064.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Construction of Project by the Department of Water Resources [11550. - 11567.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11550. - 11556.]

11550.

The provisions of this chapter are subject to the provisions of Chapter 4 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11551.

The department shall design all works to be constructed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11552.

The department may construct the works or any portion thereof or may contract with the United States that the works or any portion thereof may be constructed by and through the department under the supervision and subject to the approval of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11553.

The cost of all works authorized to be constructed under this chapter shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued and sold under the provisions of this part, or from contributions, appropriations, or loans as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11554.

All works constructed pursuant to this chapter shall be constructed under and in accordance with the provisions of the State Contract Act insofar as the provisions of that act are applicable, except that the amount of cash bidders’ bonds or certified checks required to accompany any bid submitted, when bids relating to the construction of any works are called for, shall be fixed and determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11554.1.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the State Contract Act, the department may award and enter into construction contracts which require expenditures in excess of funds presently available therefor, but the obligation of the department and the State in such contracts shall be expressly contingent upon sufficient funds being made available by future appropriations or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2054.)
-------------------------------------------

11555.

The department shall require of each contractor bonds for the faithful performance of any contract or subcontract and for the payment for any labor, materials, or supplies used in, upon, for, or about the performance of the work contracted to be done. The bonds shall fix such terms and conditions and be in such amounts as the department deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11556.

Money realized on any such bonds shall be paid into the construction fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Time of Construction [11560. - 11560.]

11560.

The department shall construct the project when, in its judgment, appropriations, contributions, and revenues from all sources which are available or which will be made or become available upon, during, after, or before construction of the project, including contracts which the department may negotiate and enter into with responsible persons, public or private agencies, the United States, and state agencies for the sale or disposal of water, water flow, the use of water, water storage, electric power, or other resources and facilities to be made available by the project, are or will be available from such sources in such amounts and at such times as will afford funds sufficient to pay and discharge as and when the same become due and payable all cost and expense incurred prior to construction, and all cost and expense of construction, operation, and maintenance of the project, together with necessary repairs and replacements thereto, including funds sufficient to meet and pay, as and when they become due and payable, all bonds, with interest accruing thereon, within a period of not to exceed 70 years after the beginning of the construction of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sequence of Units [11565. - 11567.]

11565.

The construction of all or any part of the San Joaquin Pumping System may be deferred until such time as the department determines that the construction of it is required and is economically justified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11566.

In case the construction of all or any part of the San Joaquin Pumping System is deferred, the construction of all other units of the project shall be commenced and carried to completion without reference to the construction so deferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11567.

The department shall ascertain and determine when the project or any unit thereof is completed and thereupon the project or unit shall be deemed completed for all purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Acquisition and Disposal of Property [11575. - 11595.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11575. - 11578.]

11575.

For the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating the project and for the purpose of providing and substituting new facilities for facilities to be taken or destroyed, the department may acquire for and in the name of the state, by gift, exchange, purchase, or eminent domain proceedings, within or without the state, any and all water, water rights, rights-of-way, easements, land, electric power, power resources and facilities, and property or appurtenances thereto of every kind and description and any appurtenances to any such property as the department determines to be required and necessary for the proper construction, maintenance, and operation of the project and for effectuating the purposes and objects to be accomplished by the construction, maintenance, and operation of the project, and for providing and substituting new facilities for facilities taken or destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 941, Sec. 3.   Effective September 19, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

11576.

The cost of contruction of the project includes the cost and expense of acquiring property and any such cost and expense is an integral part of the capital cost of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11577.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way interfere with or abridge the right of the department or of any state agency to acquire any property through the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11578.

In any lease, easement, or right of entry agreement entered into whereby the department leases real property or obtains a grant of easement, right-of-way, or right of entry in real property for the purpose of exploration for, or construction, operation, or maintenance of, water projects, or for other investigations or data collection, the department may agree to indemnify and hold harmless the lessor or grantor and may agree to repair or pay for any damage caused by reason of the uses authorized by such lease, easement, right-of-way or right of entry. Insurance may be purchased by the Department of General Services, upon request of the department, to protect the department against loss or expense arising out of such a lease, easement, right-of-way, or right of entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eminent Domain Proceedings [11580. - 11588.]

11580.

When the department cannot acquire any necessary property by agreement with the owner, the department may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire the property in the name of the state if the project for which the property is being acquired has been authorized and funds are available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

11584.

No water which, prior to January 13, 1934, was appropriated, or for which application has been filed prior to January 13, 1934, and remains in good standing, nor any tunnels, canals, dams, and appurtenant works dedicated to public use prior to July 1, 1933, may be acquired by the department through eminent domain proceedings except, unless and until it is first determined in a court of competent jurisdiction that the use proposed to be made thereof by the department is a more necessary public use than that to which it has already been appropriated or dedicated.

(History: Amended in Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11585.

Where any water or property mentioned in the next preceding section has, prior to July 1, 1933, been filed on, appropriated, or dedicated to public use by any State agency, the use thereof by the State agency shall be deemed a more necessary public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11586.

Where any water or property mentioned in Section 11584 has, prior to July 1, 1933, been filed on, appropriated, or dedicated to a public use by any state agency and the use proposed to be made thereof by the department is consistent with the continuance of the use thereof by the state agency for its purposes, the right to use such property for the purposes proposed by the department is common and consistent with the use being made thereof by the state agency and may be acquired by eminent domain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11588.

Whenever the right of occupancy of any person upon national forest or national park lands is terminated because of the construction of the project, the department shall, in connection with the construction of the project, acquire, by purchase or condemnation, any buildings or improvements constructed upon such lands by the person. In any such purchase or condemnation proceedings, the department shall pay the value of the improvements in place as the value existed prior to revocation of the federal permit or their replacement cost, less depreciation, whichever is lesser.

This section is not applicable to improvements located on right-of-way across national forest or national park lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1570.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Acquiring Facilities of Public Utilities and State Agencies [11590. - 11592.]

11590.

The department has no power to take or destroy the whole or any part of the line or plant of any common carrier railroad, other public utility, or state agency, or the appurtenances thereof, either in the construction of any dam, canal, or other works, or by including the same within the area of any reservoir, unless and until the department has provided and substituted for the facilities to be taken or destroyed new facilities of like character and at least equal in usefulness with suitable adjustment for any increase or decrease in the cost of operating and maintenance thereof, or unless and until the taking or destruction has been permitted by agreement executed between the department and the common carrier, public utility, or state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11591.

The expense of the department in complying with the requirements of this article is part of the cost of constructing the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11592.

In the event the department and any common carrier railroad, other public utility, or state agency fail to agree as to the character or location of new facilities to be provided as required in this article, the character and location of the new facilities and any other controversy concerning requirements imposed by this chapter shall be submitted to and determined and decided by the Public Utilities Commission of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Property [11595. - 11595.]

11595.

Subject to the provisions of Section 11464, the department may do any of the following:

(a) Sell or otherwise dispose of any rights of way, easements, or property when it determines than they are no longer needed for the purposes of this part.

(b) Lease or rent rights of way, easements, or property.

(c) Take, receive, and apply for the purposes and objects of this part the income, profit, and revenue received from the sale, lease, rental, or other disposal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Contracts [11625. - 11671.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11625. - 11628.]

11625.

Any state agency, mutual water company, political subdivision, or other entity or organization may enter into contracts with the department for the purchase or for the use of water, water flow, water storage, electric power, or other resources and facilities made available by the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11626.

In entering into and awarding contracts, in case of equal or equivalent offers, including consideration of the cost of construction, operation, and maintenance of the necessary lines, plants, and other works to deliver the commodity or service which is to be delivered under the contracts, the department shall grant preference to state agencies or other organizations not organized or doing business for profit but primarily for the purpose of supplying water or electric power to their own citizens or members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11627.

Every contract made by the department for the sale of water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service shall provide that, in the event of any default in the payment of any money specified in the contract to be paid to the department, the department may, upon such notice as it determines, cease to furnish or deliver water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11628.

The act of the department in ceasing on any default to furnish or deliver water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service under a contract shall not deprive the department of or limit any remedy provided by the contract or by law for the recovery of money due or which may become due under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts with State Agencies [11650. - 11656.]

11650.

In case of the award by the department of any contract or lease to any state agency for the furnishing of water, the use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service, upon demand made therefor by such state agency, the department shall construct, acquire, or otherwise provide the necessary works and facilities for transmitting the water, electric power, or other service to a central point from which the water, electric power, or other service may be most conveniently distributed within the territory to be served under the contract or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11651.

The governing body charged with the levying of taxes or assessments in any state agency which contracts to purchase from the department any water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service shall provide for the punctual payment to the department of all amounts which become due under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11652.

The governing body shall, whenever necessary, levy upon all property in the state agency not exempt from taxation, a tax or assessment sufficient to provide for all payments under the contract then due or to become due within the then current fiscal year or within the following fiscal year before the time when money will be available from the next general tax levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

11653.

All officers of any State agency charged with the collection of the taxes or assessments levied by the State agency shall enforce and collect all taxes or assessments levied or assessed for the purpose of providing payment of the money due or to become due under a contract as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11654.

All money collected for taxes or assessments under this article shall be kept in a separate fund by the treasurer or other officer of the state agency charged with the safekeeping and disbursement of funds of the state agency, and, upon the written demand of the department, the treasurer or other officer shall pay over to the department all such money in his possession or control and the money shall be applied by the department to the satisfaction of the amount due under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1132.)
-------------------------------------------

11655.

In the event of failure, neglect, or refusal of any officer of any state agency to levy any tax or assessment necessary to provide payment by the state agency under any contract with the department, to enforce or to collect the tax or assessment, or to pay over to the department any money collected on the tax or assessment the department may take such action in a court of competent jurisdiction as it deems necessary to compel the performance in their proper sequence of all duties relating to the levying and collection of the taxes or assessments and the payment of the money collected therefrom to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11656.

The use by the department of any remedy specified in this article for the enforcement of any contract made with it is not exclusive and shall not deprive the department of, or limit the application of, any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Additional Provisions Relating to Contracts with State Agencies [11661. - 11664.]

11661.

In addition to the powers conferred by law, and not in derogation or in limitation thereof, any state agency may enter into and execute appropriate contracts with the department for any and all the purposes and objects of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11661.1.

The department may agree in a contract with a state agency or department of a state agency that payments to be made under a contract for joint development of water conveyance and hydroelectric facilities on the west branch of the California Aqueduct shall be made only from funds under the management and control of the state agency or department of a state agency derived from revenues from the sale of electric energy and are not to be made from funds derived from the levy of taxes upon taxable property within the state agency. The provisions of Sections 11652 to 11655, inclusive, shall not be applicable to contracts containing such a provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 758.)
-------------------------------------------

11662.

Any State agency may comply with the terms, provisions, and conditions of any contract entered into by it pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

11663.

Any state agency may, in or pursuant to a contract with the department, do any or all of the following:

(a) Provide in the contract for the segregation and allocation of any or all revenues received by the state agency from the sale, use or distribution of any water, use of water, electric power, or other facilities to be received, used, or distributed by the state agency under the contract.

(b) Pursuant to the contract, segregate, allocate, and devote such revenues solely for the purpose of making payments to the department for water, use of water, electric power, or other facilities to be received, used, or distributed under the contract.

(c) Provide in the contract for the pledge of any or all such revenues for the purpose of securing to the department any payments which may become due under the contract.

(d) Pursuant to the contract, pledge such revenues for the purpose of securing to the department any payments which may become due under the contract.

(e) Promise and agree to establish and maintain a special account to be created in and from its general fund or other appropriate fund.

(f) Pursuant to subdivision (e) create, establish, and maintain such special account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11664.

All funds accruing to a special account established pursuant to the next preceding section, or deposited therein, in compliance with the terms and provisions of any contract with the department constitute a trust fund for the purpose of making payments to the department as provided in the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Contracts Other Than With State Agencies [11670. - 11671.]

11670.

Any contract or lease made by the department with any person, other than a state agency, providing for the furnishing by the department of water, the use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service for resale shall be subject to cancellation by the department upon five years’ notice, and such a contract or lease shall be so canceled in whole or in part whenever the State or any financially responsible state agency makes application for the water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service, or any part thereof, covered by the contract or lease and enters into a contract or lease binding itself to take the water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service, or any part thereof, and pay for it at a rate or price at least equal to that specified in the contract or lease to be canceled and for a period at least equal to the unexpired portion of the term of such contract or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11671.

The department shall not cancel any contract or lease under the next preceding section unless and until it first determines and assures itself that notwithstanding the cancellation, it will receive and be paid a total revenue or consideration at least equal to that which would be received by it were the contract or lease not canceled, and within the unexpired portion of the term of the contract or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Bonds [11700. - 11784.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization to Issue and Reduction of Aggregate Amount [11700. - 11701.]

11700.

For the purpose of providing money and funds to pay the cost and expense of carrying out any of the objects and purposes of this part, the department may, from time to time, issue bonds. As used in this chapter, “bonds” means revenue bonds, notes, refunding bonds, refunding notes, bond anticipation notes, certificates of indebtedness, and other evidences of indebtedness payable from the sources provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11701.

Whenever the department determines that it is necessary to carry out any of the objects and purposes of this part, it shall prepare preliminary cost estimates, an estimate of the amount required to be raised for those purposes by the issuance of bonds, and a statement of the probable amount of money, property, materials, or labor, if any, to be contributed from other sources in aid thereof, and shall adopt a resolution declaring that the public interest and necessity require the carrying out of those objects and purposes and authorizing the issuance of bonds for the purpose of obtaining funds in an amount not in excess of that estimated to be required for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   Effective June 6, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [11705. - 11714.]

11705.

Bonds shall be issued in the name of the department and shall constitute obligations only of the department and shall be identified as Central Valley Project revenue bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

11706.

Any provisions not inconsistent with this part may be contained in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds which limit, restrict, or regulate the holding, deposit, investment, and application of money consisting of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds or the revenues received from the operation of the project, and such provisions shall constitute a contract with the holders of the bonds and be binding upon the department as long as the bonds are outstanding. The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may also contain any provisions not inconsistent with this part which are determined by the department and the Treasurer to be necessary or desirable to improve the marketability of the bonds or lower the interest cost on the bonds to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11707.
